Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 3A State and Local Government Partnership

28-5-47.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “State and Local Government Partnership Act of 1995.”

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-47.1.
Legislative intent and purpose.

It is the intent and purpose of the General Assembly in enacting this article:

To strengthen the partnership between the State of Georgia and local political subdivisions;

To assist the General Assembly in its consideration of proposed legislation and new and revised state programs containing fiscal requirements affecting local political subdivisions by:

Requiring the provision of accurate estimates of the fiscal impact upon local political subdivisions of proposed legislation and new and revised state programs; and

Establishing a mechanism to bring such information to the attention of the members of the General Assembly before the House of Representatives or Senate, respectively, votes on proposed legislation;

To promote informed and deliberate decisions by the General Assembly on the appropriateness of proposed fiscal impact legislation in any particular instances;

To improve the quality of state regulations affecting local political subdivisions and the process by which those regulations are developed by:

Providing that state agencies consult with elected and other officials of local political subdivisions; and

Requiring that state agencies prepare accurate estimates of the budgetary impact of state regulatory mandates upon local political subdivisions before adopting such regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-47.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-48.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community affairs.

“Department” means the Department of Community Affairs.

“Fiscal note” means a realistic statement of the estimated financial cost of implementing or complying with the proposed law, regulation, rule, order, or administrative law upon local political subdivisions to which the proposed law, regulation, rule, order, or administrative law applies.

“Local political subdivision” means a county, municipality, county school district, or independent school district.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-48.1.
Applicability to proposed laws for which full funding to affected localities has been appropriated.

This article shall not apply to any proposed bill, resolution, regulation, rule, order, or administrative law for which an appropriation, in an amount sufficient to fund the full cost of the proposal, has been made to affected local political subdivisions.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-48.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-49.
Analysis of costs of proposed bills and joint resolutions to affected localities; filing of fiscal notes; requests by representatives of local political subdivisions for copies; waiver of requirements.

The department shall conduct any analysis to determine the cost of implementation or compliance for all bills and joint resolutions introduced in the General Assembly which have a fiscal impact on local political subdivisions. Before any vote is taken in a committee of the House of Representatives or Senate or on the floor of either house upon any bill or joint resolution determined by the department to require an expenditure which in the aggregate exceeds $5 million of public funds by local political subdivisions, a fiscal note shall be attached to such bill or resolution and shall be filed by the sponsor of the bill with the chairperson of the committee and the Clerk of the House of Representatives or the Secretary of the Senate and shall be provided to all members of the General Assembly. Any representative of any local political subdivision requesting a copy of the fiscal note shall be furnished with a copy immediately upon request to the Clerk of the House of Representatives or the Secretary of the Senate. This Code section shall not apply to a bill or joint resolution that is necessary for the state to assume the administration of regulatory programs mandated by federal statute.

The requirements of this Code section may be waived by the committee to which the bill is assigned in the chamber wherein the bill is introduced. Any such waiver shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the committee. Any such waiver by the committee shall allow consideration of the measure by both chambers.

The requirements of this Code section may be waived:

By a majority vote of the House of Representatives or by the Speaker of the House with respect to a bill introduced in the House of Representatives; or

By majority vote of the Senate or by the President of the Senate with respect to a bill introduced in the Senate.

Any such waiver shall allow consideration of the measure by both the House of Representatives and the Senate.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 28.

28-5-50.
Filing of notes for regulations, rules, or orders; requests by local political subdivisions for copies.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, no regulation, rule, order, or administrative law which would have a fiscal impact which in the aggregate exceeds $5 million on local political subdivisions in this state shall be valid unless 30 days prior to its adoption by a board, commission, agency, department, officer, or other authority of the government of this state, except the General Assembly, the courts, and the Governor, such board, commission, agency, department, officer, or other authority shall file a fiscal note with the members of the General Assembly. Any local political subdivisions that will be affected by the proposed regulation, rule, policy, order, or administrative law, upon request, shall immediately be furnished with a copy of the fiscal note by the board, commission, agency, department, officer, or other authority. This Code section shall not apply to an emergency regulation, rule, order, or administrative law as described by subsection (b) of Code Section 50-13-4, to any rule or regulation adopted or order issued pursuant to legislation exempted from Code Section 28-5-49, or to any other order issued to abate or prevent violations of specific statutory provisions enacted by the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

28-5-51.
Contents of fiscal note.

A fiscal note shall contain an aggregated estimate of the fiscal impact of a bill, a joint resolution, or an administrative action on local political subdivisions for the fiscal year in which it would become effective, if enacted, and for the next two succeeding fiscal years. If the fiscal impact of the bill, joint resolution, or administrative action is not expected to be totally evident within the applicable period, the estimate shall be projected beyond that period to include an estimate for the first fiscal year in which it is expected to be fully effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-52.
Assistance of other departments and agencies in the preparation of fiscal notes for bills and joint resolutions; required names and signatures.

The other departments or agencies of the state government shall assist the department in the preparation of fiscal notes required by this article. Where appropriate, the commissioner shall seek the advice and assistance of local government officials or their representatives. The departments or agencies of state government assisting in the preparation of the fiscal note shall be clearly indicated on the fiscal note along with the signature of the commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representative indicating that the commissioner agrees with the fiscal impact estimated thereon.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-53.
Revision of fiscal note where fiscal effect of bill or joint resolution changed by amendment; waiver of such revision; processing of revised fiscal note.

A fiscal note that is attached to a bill or joint resolution shall be revised by the commissioner at each successive stage of the legislative process in which an amendment is adopted that changes the fiscal effect of the bill or joint resolution, unless this requirement is waived by the President of the Senate, by a majority vote of the Senate, by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or by a majority vote of the House of Representatives. A revised fiscal note shall not be required for any amendment which either increases local revenues or decreases mandated expenditures.

The revised fiscal note shall be processed by the commissioner and returned as quickly as possible to the committee or the Clerk of the House of Representatives or Secretary of the Senate if either the Clerk or the Secretary has the custody of the bill or joint resolution at that time.

Except as otherwise provided by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, a waiver of a fiscal note shall be replaced at any time with a fiscal note if an amendment to a bill or joint resolution causes the bill or joint resolution to have an effect upon the revenues or expenditures of local political subdivisions.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, §§ 7, 8; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

28-5-54.
Preservation of copies of fiscal notes and waivers; availability for public inspection; publication in journals for each house of the General Assembly.

A copy of each fiscal note or waiver of a fiscal note shall be retained by the commissioner and shall be reasonably available for public inspection for at least three years following its preparation. The fiscal note or waiver of a fiscal note shall be published in the journal of each house of the General Assembly.

A fiscal note, upon being filed as provided in this article, shall be open to inspection by the general public as provided by Code Sections 50-18-70 through 50-18-72.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 9; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

28-5-55.
[Reserved] Exemptions from this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 10; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 28; repealed by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5, effective April 21, 1995.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 21, 1995.

28-5-56.
Presumption as to compliance with this article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require any degree of formality of proof of compliance with any requirement of this article, and any enrolled bill shall be conclusively presumed to have been enacted in compliance with the requirements of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § .5.